Utah statutes.
26-21-7.   Exempt facilities.
This chapter does not apply to:
(1)  a dispensary or first aid facility maintained by any commercial or
industrial plant,  educational institution, or convent;
(2)  a health care facility owned or operated by an agency of the United
States;
(3)  the office of a physician or dentist whether it is an individual or group
practice;
(4)  a health care facility established or operated by any recognized church
or denomination for the practice of religious tenets administered by mental or
spiritual means without the use of drugs, whether gratuitously or for
compensation, if it complies with statutes and rules on environmental
protection and life safety;
(5)  any health care facility owned or operated by the Department of
Corrections, created in Section 64-13-2; and
(6)  a residential facility providing 24-hour care:
(a)  that does not employ direct care staff;
(b)  in which the residents of the facility contract with a licensed hospice
agency to receive end-of-life medical care; and
(c)  that meets other requirements for an exemption as designated by
administrative rule.
